Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8486.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-46-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-46 entitled "Open
Meetings" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-46-5. Purposes for which meeting may be closed — Use of electronic
communications — Judicial proceedings — Disruptive conduct.
(a) A public body may hold a meeting closed to the public pursuant to § 42-46-4 for one
or more of the following purposes:
(1) Any discussions of the job performance, character, or physical or mental health of a
person or persons provided that the person or persons affected shall have been notified in advance
in writing and advised that they may require that the discussion be held at an open meeting.
Failure to provide notification shall render any action taken against the person or persons
affected null and void. Before going into a closed meeting pursuant to this subsection, the public
body shall state for the record that any persons to be discussed have been so notified and this
statement shall be noted in the minutes of the meeting.
(2) Sessions pertaining to collective bargaining or litigation, or work sessions pertaining to
collective bargaining or litigation.
(3) Discussion regarding the matter of security including, but not limited to, the deployment
of security personnel or devices.
(4) Any investigative proceedings regarding allegations of misconduct, either civil or
criminal.

(5) Any discussions or considerations related to the acquisition or lease of real property for
public purposes, or of the disposition of publicly held property wherein advanced public
information would be detrimental to the interest of the public.
(6) Any discussions related to or concerning a prospective business or industry locating in
the state of Rhode Island when an open meeting would have a detrimental effect on the interest of
the public.
(7) A matter related to the question of the investment of public funds where the premature
disclosure would adversely affect the public interest. Public funds shall include any investment
plan or matter related thereto, including, but not limited to, state lottery plans for new promotions.
(8) Any executive sessions of a local school committee exclusively for the purposes: (i) Of
conducting student disciplinary hearings; or (ii) Of reviewing other matters that relate to the privacy
of students and their records, including all hearings of the various juvenile hearing boards of any
municipality; provided, however, that any affected student shall have been notified in advance in
writing and advised that the student may require that the discussion be held in an open meeting.
Failure to provide notification shall render any action taken against the student or students
affected null and void. Before going into a closed meeting pursuant to this subsection, the public
body shall state for the record that any students to be discussed have been so notified and this
statement shall be noted in the minutes of the meeting.
(9) Any hearings on, or discussions of, a grievance filed pursuant to a collective bargaining
agreement.
(10) Any discussion of the personal finances of a prospective donor to a library.
(b) No meeting of members of a public body or use of electronic communication, including
telephonic communication and telephone conferencing, shall be used to circumvent the spirit or
requirements of this chapter; provided, however, these meetings and discussions are not prohibited.
(1) Provided, further however, that discussions of a public body via electronic
communication, including telephonic communication and telephone conferencing, shall be
permitted only to schedule a meeting, except as provided in this subsection.
(2) Provided, further however, that a member of a public body may participate by use of
electronic communication or telephone communication while on active duty in the armed services
of the United States.
(3) Provided, further however, that a member of that public body, who has a disability as
defined in chapter 87 of this title and:
(i) Cannot attend meetings of that public body solely by reason of the member’s disability;
and
LC006359 - Page 2 of 5

(ii) Cannot otherwise participate in the meeting without the use of electronic
communication or telephone communication as reasonable accommodation, may participate by use
of electronic communication or telephone communication in accordance with the process below.
(4) The governor’s commission on disabilities is authorized and directed to:
(i) Establish rules and regulations for determining whether a member of a public body is
not otherwise able to participate in meetings of that public body without the use of electronic
communication or telephone communication as a reasonable accommodation due to that member’s
disability;
(ii) Grant a waiver that allows a member to participate by electronic communication or
telephone communication only if the member’s disability would prevent the member from being
physically present at the meeting location, and the use of such communication is the only
reasonable accommodation; and
(iii) Any waiver decisions shall be a matter of public record.
(5) The university of Rhode Island board of trustees members, established pursuant to §
16-32-2, are authorized to participate remotely in open public meetings of the board; provided,
however, that:
(i) The remote members and all persons present at the meeting location are clearly audible
and visible to each other;
(ii) A quorum of the body is participating;
(iii) If videoconferencing is used to conduct a meeting, the public notice for the meeting
shall inform the public that videoconferencing will be used and include instructions on how the
public can access the virtual meeting; and
(iv) The board shall adopt rules defining the requirements of remote participation including
its use for executive session, and the conditions by which a member is authorized to participate
remotely.
(6) The Rhode Island Life Science Hub board of directors, established pursuant to § 23-
99-4, is authorized to participate remotely in open public meetings of the board, in accordance with
the provisions of § 23-99-4(c).
(7) The committees of the general assembly are authorized to take testimony from members
of the public remotely via electronic communication, including telephonic communication and
telephone conferencing; provided, however, that:
(i) The remote members of the public and all persons present at the meeting location are
clearly audible and visible to each other;
(ii) A quorum of the body is participating; and
LC006359 - Page 3 of 5

(iii) If videoconferencing is used to conduct a meeting, the public notice for the meeting
shall inform the public that videoconferencing will be used and include instructions on how the
public can access the virtual meeting.
(c) This chapter shall not apply to proceedings of the judicial branch of state government
or probate court or municipal court proceedings in any city or town.
(d) This chapter shall not prohibit the removal of any person who willfully disrupts a
meeting to the extent that orderly conduct of the meeting is seriously compromised.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006359
========
LC006359 - Page 4 of 5